src-fst-phonology-L2-from-branch.twolc.md
`º` is for CnsGrad of the `lg:lgg` and `lºl:ll` type
`¤:0` prevents ConsGrad in certain words
`'` is the real apostroph






































Remainder! Change all # to (Hyph) #  in order to account for ealáhus- ja ...







* *áj'gi*
* *ái0gi*
* ★*mánnáX5jd* (is not standard language)
* ★*má0ná0jd* (is not standard language)






* *áj'gi*
* *ái0gi*

* *majdege*
* *maidege*

* ★*almmajX4in* (is not standard language)
* ★*almmai0in* (is not standard language)

* *mánnáX5jd*
* *má0ná0id*

* *almmájX4*
* *almmái0*

* *almmájX4X7-#*
* *almmái00-#*

* *almmájX4in*
* *almmáj0in*





* *smirez#*
* *smires#*

* *Troandim#*
* *Troandin#*

* *Troandim-*
* *Troandin-*

* *muhtum#*
* *muhtun#*

* *skoalkkuh#*
* *skoalkkut#*

* *nagod#*
* *nagot#*

* *bávččag#*
* *bávččat#*

* *nuorab#*
* *nuorat#*

* *bávččag#*
* *bávččat#*

* *eamid#*
* *eamit#*

* *alih#*
* *alit#*


* ★*vejolažž#* (is not standard language)
* ★*vejolaž0#* (is not standard language)

* *vejolažž#*
* *vejolaš0#*

* *olmmožX4X7-*
* *olmmoš00-*

* ★*olmmožX7-* (is not standard language)
* ★*olmmoš0-* (is not standard language)

* *olmmožX4*
* *olmmoš0*





* *fijdnisY5t*
* *fiidná00t*

* ★*fijdnisY5t* (is not standard language)
* ★*fiidnás0t* (is not standard language)

* ★*fijdnisY5t* (is not standard language)
* ★*fiidnis0t* (is not standard language)

* *albmájY5*
* *albmá00*

* *olbmožY5*
* *olbmo00*

* *fijdnisY5t-*
* *fiidná00t-*

* *albmájY5-*
* *albmá00-*

* *olbmožY5-*
* *olbmo00-*



* *vuordild#*
* *vuordil0#*

* ★*vuordild#* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuordild#* (is not standard language)

* *attest#*
* *attes0#*

* ★*attest#* (is not standard language)
* ★*attest#* (is not standard language)

* *berošt#*
* *beroš0#*


* *bearjadah'k#*
* *bearjadat00#*

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadat0k#* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadat'0#* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadah00#* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadat'k#* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadah0k#* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadah'k#* (is not standard language)




* *muitaluss#*
* *muitalus0#*

* ★*vejolažž#* (is not standard language)
* ★*vejolažž#* (is not standard language)

* *vejolažž#*
* *vejolaš0#*







* *joh'kaX4*
* *jo00ga0*

* ★*joh'kaX4* `joh'kaX4` (is not standard language joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 joh'kaX4 jo0'kaX4)
* ★*joh0ga0* `jo0'ga0` (is not standard language jo00ka0 joh'ga0 joh0ka0 joh0ga0)


* *sápmiX4*
* *sá0mi0*

* ★*sápmiX4* (is not standard language)
* ★*sápmi0* (is not standard language)


* *latnjaX4*
* *la0nja0*

* *vuod'jiQ4n*
* *vuo00já0n*

* *káffeX4s*
* *ká0fe0s*


* *RuottaX4s*
* *Ruo0ta0s*




* *áhkkuX4s*
* *áh0ku0s*

* *vielljaX4*
* *vie0lja0*

* *mannjiX4*
* *ma0nji0*

* *áddjáX4*
* *á0djá0*

* *láj'biX4*
* *láibbi0*

* *seaŋ'gaX4*
* *seaŋgga0*

* *boŋ'kiX4j#*
* *boŋkki0i#*


* *sáf'taX4*
* *sáftta0*


* *oab'naX4*
* *oabnna0*

* *ám'taX4*
* *ámtta0*

* *In'gáX4*
* *Inggá0*


* *gán'daX4*
* *gándda0*


* *konseap'taX4*
* *konseaptta0*


* *áj'ruX4*
* *áirru0*

* *biev'laX4*
* *bievlla0*


* *jar'laX4*
* *jarlla0*


* *ol'juX4*
* *oljju0*


* *mát'kiX4*
* *mátkki0*



* *kreatsaX4*
* *kreatssa0*


* *beas'kaX4*
* *beaskka0*


* *čoav'jiX4*
* *čoavjji0*


* *beaj'viX4*
* *beaivvi0*

* *dujh'miX4*
* *duihmmi0*


* *čuolbmaX4*
* *čuolmma0*

* *DálmaX4*
* *Dálmma0*




* *sávdnjiX4*
* *sávnnji0*


* *čorbmaX4*
* *čorpma0*


* *skurdnjiX4*
* *skurtnji0*


* *návs'tuX4*
* *návsttu0*


* *limš'kiX4*
* *limškki0*


* *uk'saX4*
* *uvssa0*



* *teaks'taX4*
* *teavstta0*



* *spábbaX4*
* *spáppa0*



* ★*Szczecin* (is not standard language)
* ★*Szccecin* (is not standard language)

* *Szczecin*
* *Szczecin*

* *eadniX4*
* *eatni0*


* *boadnjiX4*
* *boatnji0*





* *boah'tiY1*
* *boahtti0*

* *dah'kaY7j*
* *dahkku0i*



* *dapmaY1*
* *dabmi0*

* *bitnjuY1*
* *bidnju0*

* *dad'jaY1*
* *daddji0*





* *joh'kaX4*
* *jo00ga0*
















* *gáv'piX7*
* *gáv0pe0*

* *bassiX7*
* *basse0*














* *buorriX7#*
* *buorre0#*

* *buorriX8#*
* *buo0re0#*


* *várriX7gir'ku#*
* *várre0gir0ku#*






* *lijgiX7#ruh'taX4jd#*
* *liige00ru00đa0id#*






* *čuor'vuQ6*
* *čuorvvo0*


* *boah'tiQ6*
* *boa00đe0*




* *láj'kiW1s#*
* *láikke0s#*

* *ál'kiW2s#*
* *ál0ke0s#*



* *váttisW1#*
* *váttes0#*

* *head'jusW1-*
* *hea00jos0-*

* *head'jusW1#*
* *hea00jos0#*

* *váttisW1-*
* *váttes0-*





























* *goah'tiX5jd*
* *go000đi0id*














* *vieh'ki¤X5jn*
* *vi0hkki00in*


















* *reŋ'koX2jd*
* *reŋ0ku0id*

* *basteX2j*
* *basti0i*

* *asibealle7X2j*
* *asibealli0ide*

* *LineX2j*
* *Lini0i*




* *áhččiX2n*
* *áhččá0n*






* *stahtaX3j*
* *stahti0i*

* *Sij9teW9j*
* *Sijte0i*









* *fijdnisY5t*
* *fiidná00t*


* *oažžuQ8dit*
* *o0ččo0dit*

* *coah'kuX8stit*
* *coa00go0stit*



* *jearraQ1*
* *jearrá0*

* *boah'tiQ1*
* *boah0tá0*


* *jearraQ3n*
* *je0rro0n*

* *jearraQ2t*
* *je0rre0t*

* *boah'tiQ3n*
* *bo0h0to0n*

* *čuor'vuQ3n*
* *ču0r0vo0n*


* *jearraQ2*
* *je0rre0*

* *boah'tiQ2t*
* *bo0h0te0t*

* *čuor'vuQ2*
* *ču0r0vo0*


* *boah'tiQ4n*
* *boa00đá0n*

* *boah'tiQ5lin*
* *boa00đá0lin*







* *jearraY1*
* *jearri0*



* *jearraY2*
* *jearru0*

* *boah'tiY2*
* *boahttu0*


* *jearraQ2t*
* *je0rre0t*

boah'tiY4t ! It seems it should be Q3. ... both?!
* *boah'tiQ3t*
* *bo0h0to0t*


čuor'vuY4t ! Q2, it seems.
* *čuor'vuQ2t*
* *ču0r0vo0t*



* *jearraY7t*
* *je0rro0t*

* *boah'tiY7t*
* *bo0htto0t*

* *čuor'vuY7t*
* *ču0r0vo0t*

* *jearraY7juvvot*
* *je0rro0juvvot*






* *jearraY7j*
* *je0rru0i*

* *dah'kaY7j*
* *dahkku0i*

* *loikaY7j*
* *loiku0i*
















* *beatnag8X4*
* *bea0na00*

* *luopmin8X4*
* *luo0mi00*

* *giellum8X4*
* *gie0lu00*












Changed because:we get almmáj- and not almmái-
Postvocalic j surfaces as i
Is this what we want?? without right context??? postvoc j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) (Dummy: ) _ ;






* *#hálijd#*
* *0háliit#*

* ★*hálijd#* (is not standard language)
* ★*háliid#* (is not standard language)





* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/phonology-L2-from-branch.twolc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/../src/fst/phonology-L2-from-branch.twolc)</small>
